Wisconsin, session 2025, AB209.
do enact as follows:AB209,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB209,27Section 2. 20.370 (9) (pq) of the statutes is created to read:AB209,3,11820.370 (9) (pq) Great Lakes erosion control revolving loan program. As a 9continuing appropriation, from the environmental fund, the amounts in the 10schedule for the Great Lakes erosion control revolving loan program under s. 1123.199.AB209,312Section 3. 20.465 (3) (v) of the statutes is created to read:AB209,3,161320.465 (3) (v) Hazard mitigation revolving loan program; payments. From the 14hazard mitigation revolving loan fund, all moneys received from the repayment of 15principal and interest on loans made under s. 323.65, to provide loans under s. 16323.65.AB209,417Section 4. 20.465 (3) (w) of the statutes is created to read:AB209,3,201820.465 (3) (w) Hazard mitigation revolving loan program; state funds. From 19the hazard mitigation revolving loan fund, all moneys transferred from the general 20fund under s. 323.65 (4), to provide loans under s. 323.65.AB209,521Section 5. 20.465 (3) (x) of the statutes is created to read:AB209,4,22220.465 (3) (x) Hazard mitigation revolving loan program; federal funds. From 1the hazard mitigation revolving loan fund, all moneys received from the federal 2government under 42 USC 5135, to provide loans under s. 323.65.AB209,63Section 6. 23.199 of the statutes is created to read:AB209,4,8423.199 Great Lakes erosion control revolving loan program. (1) The 5department shall administer a revolving loan program to assist municipalities and 6owners of homes located on the shore of Lake Michigan or Lake Superior where the 7structural integrity of municipal buildings or homes is threatened by erosion of the 8shoreline.AB209,4,109(2) The department shall make loans under this section from the 10appropriation account under s. 20.370 (9) (pq).AB209,4,1311(3) The department shall promulgate rules to administer this section, 12including rules establishing eligibility criteria and income limitations for loans 13under this section.AB209,714Section 7. 25.17 (1) (gg) of the statutes is created to read:AB209,4,151525.17 (1) (gg) Hazard mitigation revolving loan fund (s. 25.34);AB209,816Section 8. 25.34 of the statutes is created to read:AB209,4,191725.34 Hazard mitigation revolving loan fund. There is established a 18separate nonlapsible trust fund, designated as the hazard mitigation revolving loan 19fund, to consist of the following:AB209,4,2120(1) All moneys transferred from the general fund under s. 323.65 (4) to the 21hazard mitigation revolving loan fund.AB209,4,2322(2) All moneys received from the federal government under 42 USC 5135, 23designated for loans under the hazard mitigation revolving loan fund.AB209,5,21(3) All repayments of principal and payments of interest on loans made under 2s. 323.65 (3).AB209,93Section 9. 323.65 of the statutes is created to read:AB209,5,74323.65 Hazard mitigation revolving loan program. (1) Authorization. 5The division may enter into an agreement with the federal government as provided 6in 42 USC 5135 to provide hazard mitigation loans to local units of government 7under sub. (2).AB209,5,138(2) Establishment. If an agreement is entered into as provided under sub. 9(1), the division shall establish and administer a hazard mitigation revolving loan 10program under which the division provides loans to local units of government from 11the appropriations under s. 20.465 (3) (v), (w), and (x) for the purpose of funding 12hazard mitigation projects in accordance with the requirements of 42 USC 5135 13and the agreement entered into under sub. (1).AB209,5,1614(3) Repayments. All repayments of principal and interest on loans provided 15under any program established under sub. (2) shall be credited to the appropriation 16account under s. 20.465 (3) (v).AB209,5,2117(4) General fund transfers. Beginning on June 30, 2026, in each fiscal 18year, the secretary of administration shall transfer from the general fund to the 19hazard mitigation revolving loan fund an amount equal to 10 percent of any moneys 20received in that fiscal year from the federal government pursuant to an agreement 21under sub. (1).AB209,1022Section 10. Nonstatutory provisions.AB209,6,323(1) Position authorization. The authorized FTE positions for the 1department of natural resources, funded from the appropriation under s. 20.370 (9) 2(pq), are increased by 0.5 SEG position for the purpose of administering the Great 3Lakes erosion control revolving loan program.AB209,6,154(2) Emergency rules. The department of natural resources may use the 5procedure under s. 227.24 to promulgate emergency rules under s. 23.199 for the 6period before the date on which permanent rules under s. 23.199 take effect. 7Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (c) and (2), emergency rules promulgated under this 8subsection remain in effect until the first day of the 25th month beginning after the 9effective date of the emergency rules, the date on which the permanent rules take 10effect, or the effective date of the repeal of the emergency rules, whichever is earlier. 11Notwithstanding s. 227.24 (1) (a) and (3), the department of natural resources is not 12required to provide evidence that promulgating a rule under this subsection as 13emergency rules is necessary for the preservation of public peace, health, safety, or 14welfare and is not required to provide a finding of emergency for a rule promulgated 15under this subsection.AB209,1116Section 11. Effective date.AB209,6,1817(1) This act takes effect on the day after publication, or on the 2nd day after 18publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, whichever is later.AB209,6,1919